Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 3. Name, Formation, Articles of Formation, Other Filings and Organizational Documents

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-301.
Name of a statutory foundation.

The words “statutory foundation”, or its abbreviations “SF” or “S.F.”, shall be included in the name of a statutory foundation formed under this act. A statutory foundation name shall not:

Contain words indicating or implying that the foundation is organized for a purpose other than one (1) or more of the purposes contained in its articles of formation;

Be the same as, or deceptively similar to in the determination of the secretary of state, any trademark or service mark registered in this state. The name shall be distinguishable by the secretary of state from other business names as provided in W.S.

17-16-401

;

Contain a word or phrase which indicates or implies that it is organized under the Wyoming Business Corporation Act, the Wyoming Statutory Close Corporation Supplement, the Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act, the Wyoming Limited Liability Company Act or the Wyoming Statutory Trust Act.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit the use of a trade name in accordance with applicable law.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-302.
Registered office and registered agent.

Each statutory foundation shall continuously maintain a registered office and registered agent, as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

, in this state.

The provisions of W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

shall apply to all statutory foundations.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-303.
Formation of statutory foundation; articles of formation.

One (1) or more persons may act as an organizer to form a statutory foundation by signing and delivering articles of formation to the secretary of state. Articles of formation shall be accompanied by a written consent of appointment signed by a registered agent.

Articles of formation shall state:

The name of the statutory foundation, which shall comply with W.S.

17-30-301

; and

The street address of the statutory foundation’s initial registered office and the name of its initial registered agent at that office.

Articles of formation may state:

The names and addresses of the individuals who are to serve as the initial directors;

The name and address of the individual who is to serve as the initial protector;

Other provisions not inconsistent with law, which may include:

The purpose for which the statutory foundation is organized;

An express statement that the purpose of the statutory foundation “may be amended”, “may be restated” or words of similar import, pursuant to W.S. 17-30-201(f);

A statement of the duration of the statutory foundation;

Any provision under this act that is required or permitted to be stated in the operating agreement.

A statutory foundation is formed when the articles of formation become effective. The filing of articles of formation by the secretary of state is conclusive proof that the organizer has satisfied all conditions required for the formation of a statutory foundation, except in a civil action commenced by the state of Wyoming to terminate a statutory foundation. In that case, a court may require other additional evidence as it determines appropriate.

The articles of formation may be amended or restated only if the articles of formation include an express statement authorizing the amendment or restatement of the articles of formation.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 98, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

added (e).

Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-304.
Signing of records to be delivered for filing to secretary of state.

A record delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this act shall be signed as follows:

Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, a record signed on behalf of a statutory foundation shall be signed by a person who has appropriate authority granted by the foundation;

The initial articles of formation of a statutory foundation shall be signed by at least one (1) person acting as founder or organizer;

A record filed on behalf of a terminated statutory foundation that has no founders shall be signed by the person winding up the activities of the foundation under article 9 of this chapter, the organizer or another person appointed by the board of directors of the foundation;

Any other record shall be signed by the person on whose behalf the record is delivered to the secretary of state or by the person appointed by the board of directors of the statutory foundation.

Any record filed under this act may be signed by an agent.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-305.
Delivery to and filing of records by secretary of state; effective time and date.

A record authorized or required to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this act shall be captioned to describe the purpose of the record and be delivered to the secretary of state in an authorized medium. The secretary of state shall file the record upon receipt, unless:

The secretary of state determines that a record does not comply with the filing requirements of this act;

The filing fees required by this act or other provisions of law or past due fees, taxes or penalties have not been paid.

Upon filing the record, the secretary of state shall send a copy of the filed record and a receipt for fees to the person on whose behalf the record was filed.

Upon request and payment of the requisite fee, the secretary of state shall send to the requester a certified copy of a requested record.

Except as otherwise provided in this section and W.S.

17-28-103

, a record delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this act shall be effective as of the date of filing by the secretary of state.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a record under subsection (a) of this section, the secretary of state shall return it to the filing party or its representative within fifteen (15) days after the record was delivered, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for the refusal.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (e).

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-306.
Correcting filed record.

A statutory foundation or foreign foundation may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of correction to correct a record if the record contained inaccurate information or a defective signature.

A statement of correction shall:

Describe the record to be corrected, including its filing date, or attach a copy of the record as filed;

Specify the inaccurate information and the reason the information is inaccurate or the manner in which the signature was defective; and

Correct the inaccurate information or defective signature.

When filed by the secretary of state, a statement of correction is effective retroactively as of the effective date of the record the statement corrects, except that the statement shall be effective when filed in the context of persons that previously relied on the uncorrected record and would be adversely impacted by retroactive effect.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-307.
Liability for inaccurate information in filed record.

If a record delivered to and filed by the secretary of state under this act contains inaccurate information, a person that suffers a loss by relying in good faith on the record may recover damages relating to the loss from the statutory foundation or foreign foundation if:

The record was delivered for filing on behalf of the statutory foundation or foreign foundation; and

The statutory foundation or foreign foundation had notice of the inaccuracy for a reasonably sufficient time and was able to correct the record in the period of time before the record was relied upon.

An individual who signs a record authorized or required to be filed with the secretary of state under this act shall affirm, under penalty of perjury, that the information stated in the record is accurate.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-308.
Certificate of existence.

The secretary of state, upon request and payment of the requisite fee, shall furnish to any person a certificate of existence for a statutory foundation or a foreign foundation.

A certificate of existence shall state:

The name of the statutory or foreign foundation used in this state;

That the statutory foundation was duly formed under the laws of this state and the date of formation, or that the foreign foundation is registered in this state;

Whether all fees, taxes and penalties due under this act or under other provisions of law have been paid;

Whether the most recent annual report required pursuant to W.S.

17-30-703

has been filed by the secretary of state;

Whether the secretary of state has classified the statutory foundation or foreign foundation as delinquent;

Whether articles of termination were delivered to the secretary of state for filing; and

Other facts of record maintained by the secretary of state which are specified by the person requesting the certificate of existence.

Subject to any qualification stated in a certificate of existence, a certificate of existence issued by the secretary of state shall be conclusive evidence that the statutory foundation or foreign foundation is in existence.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-309.
Operating agreement; scope, function and limitations.

The founders or board of directors of a statutory foundation shall adopt an operating agreement for the foundation as soon as possible after filing articles of formation with the secretary of state.

An operating agreement may contain any provision for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the statutory foundation that is not inconsistent with this act, other provisions of law or the articles of formation of the foundation.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.